pt-PT: Compatibilidade com padrão de identificador de chamadas: BT (Reino Unido/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Tipo 1); Interface aberta; Outro
sv: Kompatibilitet med nummerpresentationsstandard: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/typ 1); Öppet gränssnitt; Övrigt
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของมาตรฐานการแสดงหมายเลขผู้โทร: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Type 1); อินเทอร์เฟซเปิด; อื่นๆ
da: Kompatibilitet med nummervisningsstandard: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Type 1); Åben grænseflade; Andet
nb: Kompatibilitet med standard for anrops-ID: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Type 1); Åpent grensesnitt; Annet
de: Kompatibilität mit dem Rufnummernanzeige-Standard: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Typ 1); Offene Schnittstelle; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Skambinančiojo ID standarto suderinamumas: BT (JK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/1 tipas); Atvira sąsaja; Kita
ja: 発信者番号標準の互換性: BT（英国/CTS）; DTMF（ETSI）; FSK（Bellcore/タイプ1）; オープンインターフェース; その他
vi: Khả năng tương thích tiêu chuẩn ID người gọi: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Loại 1); Giao diện mở; Khác
ko: 발신자 표시 표준 호환성: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (벨코어/타입 1); 오픈 인터페이스; 기타
pt-BR: Compatibilidade com padrão de identificador de chamadas: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Tipo 1); Interface aberta; Outro
es: Compatibilidad con estándar de identificación de llamadas: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Tipo 1); Interfaz abierta; Otros
sl-SI: Združljivost s standardom ID klicatelja: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Tip 1); Odprt vmesnik; Drugo
fi: Soittajatunnuksen standardiyhteensopivuus: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/tyyppi 1); Avoin rajapinta; Muu
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost sa standardom identifikacije pozivatelja: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Tip 1); Otvoreno sučelje; Ostalo
bg-BG: Съвместимост със стандарт за идентификация на обаждащия се: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Type 1); Отворен интерфейс; Други
ru: Совместимость со стандартом определения номера: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Type 1); Открытый интерфейс; Другой
fr: Compatibilité avec les standards d’identification du correspondant: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Type 1); Interface ouverte; Autre
it: Compatibilità con lo standard ID chiamante: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Tipo 1); Interfaccia aperta; Altro
hu: Hívóazonosító szabvány kompatibilitása: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Type 1); Nyílt interfész; Egyéb
cs: Kompatibilita standardu identifikace volajícího: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/typ 1); Otevřené rozhraní; Jiné
tr: Arayan kimliği standart uyumluluğu: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Tip 1); Açık arayüz; Diğer
el: Συμβατότητα προτύπου αναγνώρισης κλήσης: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Type 1); Ανοιχτή διεπαφή; Άλλο
pl: Kompatybilność ze standardem identyfikacji dzwoniącego: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/typ 1); Interfejs otwarty; Inne
nl: Compatibiliteit met nummerweergave-standaard: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Type 1); Open interface; Andere
zh-TW: 來電顯示標準相容性: BT（英國/CTS）; DTMF（ETSI）; FSK（Bellcore/Type 1）; 開放介面; 其他
en: Caller ID standard compatibility: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Type 1); Open interface; Other
sk-SK: Kompatibilita so štandardom identifikácie volajúceho: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/typ 1); Otvorené rozhranie; Iné
zh-CN: 来电显示标准兼容性: BT（英国/CTS）; DTMF (ETSI); FSK（贝尔核心/类型 1）; 开放接口; 其他
ro-RO: Compatibilitate standard identificare apelant: BT (UK/CTS); DTMF (ETSI); FSK (Bellcore/Type 1); Interfață deschisă; Altele